Washington statutes.
RCW 11.64.040

Surviving partner may operate under agreement with estate—Termination.

The court may, in instances where it is deemed advisable, authorize and direct the personal representative of the estate of a deceased partner to enter into an agreement with the surviving partner or partners under which the surviving partner or partners may continue to operate any going business of the former partnership until the further order of the court. The court may, in its discretion, revoke such authority and direction and thereby terminate such agreement at any time by further order, entered upon the application of the personal representative or the surviving partner or partners or any interested person or on its own motion.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.64.040. Prior: 1951 c 197 s 6; prior: 1917 c 156 s 90; 1859 p 186 ss 120-130; 1854 p 274 ss 46-53; RRS s 1460.]